South Dakota, session 2026, HB1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-6:
The Game, Fish and Parks Commission shall promulgate rules, in accordance with
chapter 1-26, to extend by two days, each waterfowl hunting season, for the exclusive
use of:
(1) Individuals who are on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, as
defined in § 58-33-117; and
(2) Individuals who have served in the armed forces of the United States and were
discharged therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable.
Nothing in this section affects any licensure or permit requirements, daily and
possession limits, or any other applicable statutory or regulatory requirements.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.